src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON 2FADDA_PL  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_FADDA_PL ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:^WG^RLEN%>i Rhash ; 
+N+Pl+Gen:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Acc:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Ill:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Loc:^WG%>in CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Com:^WG%>id CPXsuffCOM ;  ! 
 
LEXICON X_FADDA_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Sg+Nom: K ;               ! kissá 
+Sg+Gen:^WG^RLEN K ;     ! fáádá, ráávsá 
+Sg+Acc:^WG^RLEN K ;     ! fáádá, ráávsá 
+Sg+Ill:^CSH^RLEN%>n K ; ! kiisán CSH? 
+Sg+Loc:^WG^RLEN%>st K ; ! fáádást, ráávsást 
+Sg+Com:^WG^CLEN%>in K ; ! kissáin, rávssáin, fáddáin DIFFERS FROM KUTKA 
+Sg+Abe:^WG%>ttáá K ;    ! kisáttáá 
+Ess:^CLEN%>n K ;        ! kissán suáiján 
+Par:^CLEN%>d K ;        ! kissád 
 
LEXICON X_FADDA_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Pl+Ill:^WG^CLEN%>id K ; ! kissáid, rávssáid, fáddáid 
 X_ALGA_PL_COMMON ; 
 
 
 
!! ### 2KISSA lexicon family 
 
LEXICON 2KISSA !!≈ * **@CODE@** ki^RVssá No root vowel lengthening
2KISSA_SG ; 
2KISSA_PL ; 
 
LEXICON 2KISSA_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_KISSA_SG ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> Rhash ; 
+N+Sg+Nom: VPXsuff12nom ;     ! kissám 
+N+Sg+Nom:^SV^SLEN VPXsuff3 ; ! kissáás 
+N+Sg+Gen: VPXsuff12 ;        ! kissán 
+N+Sg+Gen:^SV^SLEN VPXsuff3 ; ! kissáás 
+N+Sg+Acc: VPXsuff12 ;        ! kissán 
+N+Sg+Acc:^SV^SLEN VPXsuff3 ; ! kissáás 
+N+Sg+Ill:%>s CPXsuff ;       ! kissásân 
+N+Sg+Loc:^WG%>st CPXsuff ;   ! kisástân 
+N+Sg+Com:^WG%>in CPXsuff ;   ! kisáinân 
+N+Ess:%>n CPXsuff ;          ! kissánân 
+N:^WG%> Gen_DER ; 
+N:%> Nom_DER ; 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2KISSA_DIM ; !kieđâš 
 
 
 
LEXICON 2KISSA_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_KISSA_PL ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:^WG%>i Rhash ; 
+N+Pl+Gen:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;    ! kisáidân 
+N+Pl+Acc:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;    ! kisáidân 
+N+Pl+Ill:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;    ! kisáidân 
+N+Pl+Com:^WG%>id CPXsuffCOM ; ! kisáidânguin 
+N+Pl+Loc:^WG%>in CPXsuff ;    ! kisáinân 
 
LEXICON X_KISSA_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Sg+Nom: K ;                     ! kissá 
+Sg+Gen:^WG K ;                  ! kiṣá 
+Sg+Acc:^WG K ;                  ! kiṣá 
+Sg+Ill:^CSH^RLEN%>n K ;         ! kiiṣán 
+Sg+Loc:^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN%>st K ; ! kissáást 
+Sg+Com:^WG^CLEN%>in K ;         ! kissáin 
+Sg+Abe:^WG%>ttáá K ;            ! kiṣáttáá 
+Ess:%>n K ;                     ! kissán 
+Par:%>d K ;                     ! kissád 
 
LEXICON X_KISSA_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Pl+Nom:^WG%>h K ;       ! kiṣáh 
+Pl+Gen:^WG%>i K ;       ! kiṣái 
+Pl+Acc:^WG^CLEN%>id K ; ! kissáid 
+Pl+Ill:^WG^CLEN%>id K ; ! kissáid 
+Pl+Loc:^WG^CLEN%>in K ; ! kiṣsáin 
+Pl+Com:^WG%>i GUIN ;    ! kiṣáiguin 
+Pl+Abe:^WG%>ittáá K ;   ! kiṣáittáá  
 
 
 
!! ### 2CAANA lexicon family 
 
LEXICON 2CAANA  !!≈ * *@CODE@*: čááná - čá^RVn^RCá 
2CAANA_SG ; 
2CAANA_PL ; 
 
LEXICON 2CAANA_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_CAANA_SG ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:^RLEN Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:^WG^RLEN%> Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> Rhash ; 
+N+Sg+Nom:^CLEN^RLEN VPXsuff12nom ;  ! čá^RVn^RCá 
+N+Sg+Gen:^WG^RLEN VPXsuff12 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Gen:^WG^RLEN VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Acc:^WG^RLEN VPXsuff12 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Acc:^WG^RLEN VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Ill:%>s CPXsuff ; ! 
+N+Sg+Loc:^WG%>st CPXsuff ; ! 
+N+Sg+Com:^WG%>in CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Ess:^CLEN^RLEN%>n CPXsuff ;      ! kissán 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2CAANA_SG_DIM ; ! temporarily so
+N:^WG%> Gen_DER ; 
+N:%> Nom_DER ; 
 
LEXICON 2CAANA_PL  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_CAANA_PL ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:^WG^RLEN%>i Rhash ; 
+N+Pl+Gen:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Acc:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Ill:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Loc:^WG%>in CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Com:^WG%>id CPXsuffCOM ;  ! 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2CAANA_PL_DIM ; ! temporarily so


 
LEXICON X_CAANA_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Sg+Nom:^RLEN K ;               ! 
+Sg+Gen:^WG^RLEN K ;     ! 
+Sg+Gen:^WG K ;     ! 
+Sg+Acc:^WG^RLEN K ;     ! 
+Sg+Acc:^WG K ;     ! 
+Sg+Ill:^RLEN%>n K ; 
+Sg+Loc:^WG^RLEN%>st K ; ! 
+Sg+Loc:^WG%>st K ; ! 
+Sg+Com:^WG^RLEN%>in K ; ! 
+Sg+Com:^WG%>in K ; ! 
+Sg+Abe:^WG%>ttáá K ;     !  
+Ess:^CLEN^RLEN%>n K ;               ! 
+Par:^CLEN^RLEN%>d K ;               ! 
 
LEXICON X_CAANA_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Pl+Nom:^WG^RLEN%>h K ; 
+Pl+Gen:^WG^RLEN%>i K ; 
+Pl+Gen:^WG%>i K ; 
+Pl+Acc:^WG^RLEN%>id K ; 
+Pl+Acc:^WG%>id K ; 
+Pl+Ill:^WG^RLEN%>id K ; ! 
+Pl+Ill:^WG%>id K ; ! 
+Pl+Loc:^WG^RLEN%>in K ; 
+Pl+Loc:^WG%>in K ; 
+Pl+Com:^WG%>i GUIN ; K ; 
+Pl+Abe:^WG%>ittáá K ; 
 
 

!! ### 2TAHO lexicon family 
 
LEXICON 2TAHO !!≈ * **@CODE@** only for taho, similar to 2LAJO except from Pl+Ill, almost similar to 2SPAHA 
+N: 2TAHO_SG ; 
+N: 2TAHO_PL ; 
 
LEXICON 2TAHO_SG  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
2TAHO_SG_NOTPX ;
LAHO_TAHO_SG_PX ;

LEXICON 2TAHO_SG_NOTPX
! Special cases:
+Sg+Com:^WG^CLEN%>in K ;  !tavoin 
+Sg+Loc:^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN%>st K ;  !tavvoost+N+Pl+Loc:^WG^CLEN%>id K ;  !tavvoid 
! Common cases
 X_LAJO_TAHO_SG ; 
+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> Rhash ; 

LEXICON LAHO_TAHO_SG_PX
+Sg+Nom:^SV^CLEN^SLEN VPXsuff1nom ;   ! tahhoom 
+Sg+Nom:^SV^CLEN^SLEN VPXsuff2    ;   ! tahhood
+Sg+Nom:^SV^CLEN^SLEN VPXsuff3 ;      ! tahhoos 

+Sg+Gen:^SV^CLEN^SLEN VPXsuff1 ;      ! tahhoon 
+Sg+Gen:^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN VPXsuff2 ;   ! tavvood 
+Sg+Acc:^SV^CLEN^SLEN VPXsuff1 ;      ! tahhoon 
+Sg+Acc:^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN VPXsuff2 ;   ! tavvood 

+Sg+Gen:^SV^WG^RLEN^SLEN VPXsuff3 ;   ! taavoos 
+Sg+Acc:^SV^WG^RLEN^SLEN VPXsuff3 ;   ! taavoos 

+Sg+Ill:%>s CPXsuff ;                 ! tahos-
+Sg+Loc:^WG%>st CPXsuff ;             ! tavost-
+Sg+Com:^WG%>in CPXsuff ;             ! tavoin-
+Ess:%>n CPXsuff ;                    ! tahon-
:^WG%> Gen_DER ; 
:%> Nom_DER ; 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2KISSA_SG_DIM ; !kieđâš 
 
LEXICON 2TAHO_PL  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 X_OKKO_PL ; 
 LAJO_TAHO_PX_PL ; 
 
!! ### 2LAJO lexicon family 
LEXICON 2LAJO  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: 2LAJO_SG ; 
+N: 2LAJO_PL ; 
 
LEXICON 2LAJO_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
! Special cases:
+Sg+Com:^WG%>in K ;  !lajoin 
+Sg+Loc:^SV^WG^RLEN^SLEN%>st K ;  !laajoost 
! Common cases
 X_LAJO_TAHO_SG ; 
+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> Rhash ; 
! Px  
+Sg+Nom:^SV^CLEN^SLEN VPXsuff1nom ;   ! ittoom laijoom 
+Sg+Nom:^SV^CLEN^SLEN VPXsuff2    ;   ! ittood laijood 
+Sg+Nom:^SV^CLEN^SLEN VPXsuff3 ;      ! ittoos laijoos 

+Sg+Gen:^SV^CLEN^SLEN VPXsuff1 ;      ! ittoon tahhoon 
+Sg+Gen:^SV^WG^RLEN^SLEN VPXsuff2 ;   ! iiđood tavvood 
+Sg+Acc:^SV^CLEN^SLEN VPXsuff1 ;      ! ittoon tahhoon 
+Sg+Acc:^SV^WG^RLEN^SLEN VPXsuff2 ;   ! iiđood tavvood 

+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:^SV^WG^RLEN^SLEN VPXsuff3 ; ! iiđoos laajoos 
+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:^SV^WG^RLEN^SLEN VPXsuff3 ; ! iiđoos laajoos 
+Sg+Gen:^SV^WG VPXsuff3 ;                  ! iđos lajos 
+Sg+Acc:^SV^WG VPXsuff3 ;                  ! iđos lajos 

+Sg+Ill:%>s CPXsuff ;                 ! itos- 
+Sg+Loc:^WG%>st CPXsuff ;             ! iđost-
+Sg+Com:^WG%>in CPXsuff ;             ! iđoin-
+Ess:%>n CPXsuff ;                    ! iton-
:^WG%> Gen_DER ; 
:%> Nom_DER ; 
 
 
 
LEXICON X_LAJO_TAHO_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> Rhash ; 
+Sg+Nom: K ;  !laj̣o 
+Sg+Gen:^WG K ;  !lajo 
+Sg+Acc:^WG K ;  !lajo 
+Sg+Ill:^CSH%>n    K ;   !laj̣on 
+Sg+Abe:^WG%>ttáá K ;  !lajottáá 
+Ess:^SV^CLEN^SLEN%>n    K ;  !laijoon 
+Par:^SV^CLEN^SLEN%>d    K ; !laijood 


LEXICON 2LAJO_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 X_LAJO_PL ; 
+Cmp/PlGen:^WG%>i Rhash ; 
 LAJO_TAHO_PX_PL ; 
 
!LEXICON X_LAJO_TAHO_SG_NoLow !!≈ * ''@CODE@'' not yet in use 
!+Sg+Nom:                    K          ; ! laj̣o 
!+Sg+Ill:^CSH%>n             K          ; ! laj̣on 
! +N+Ess:^SV^CLEN^SLEN%>n    K          ; ! laijoon 
! +N+Par:^SV^CLEN^SLEN%>d    K          ; ! laijood 
 
LEXICON  LAJO_TAHO_PX_PL  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Pl+Gen:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+Pl+Acc:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+Pl+Ill:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+Pl+Loc:^WG%>in CPXsuff ;  ! 
+Pl+Com:^WG%>id CPXsuffCOM ;  ! 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2KISSA_PL_DIM ; !kieđâš 
 
 
 
LEXICON X_LAJO_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Pl+Ill:^WG%>id K ;  !lajoid 
+Pl+Com:^WG%>i GUIN ;  !lajoiguin 
:^WG  X_h_PL_notILL ; 
 
 
!! ### 2NJUNE lexicon family 
 
LEXICON 2NJUNE !!≈ * **@CODE@** almost similar to 2LAJO 
2NJUNE_SG ; 
2NJUNE_PL ; 
 
LEXICON X_NJUNE !!≈ * **@CODE@** almost similar to 2LAJO 
X_NJUNE_SG ; 
X_NJUNE_PL ; 
 
