src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx !!≈ * **@CODE@** here we put all normal nouns, as before
kiđđâpiäldu-ullo+Sem/Plant:kiđđâpiäldu-#u^RVllo 2KISSA "" ;
kyevtiloho+Sem/Dummytag:kyevti#lo^RVh^RCo 2TAHO "" ;
binäärloho+Sem/Dummytag:binäär#lo^RVh^RCo 2TAHO "" ;
palhâšumesaje+Sem/Dummytag:palhâšume#sa^RVj^RCe 2NJUNE "palkintosija" ;
veviluŋgá+Sem/Dummytag:vevi#lu^RVŋgá 2KISSA "rannesuoja" ;
toimâsaje+Sem/Dummytag:toimâ#sa^RVj^RCe 2NJUNE "toimitila" ;
rullá+Sem/Dummytag:ru^RVllá 2KISSA "rulla" ;
känemane+Sem/Food:käne#ma^RVn^RCe 2NJUNE "kananmuna" ;
misso+Sem/Drink:mi^RVsso 2KISSA "hera" ;
sore+Sem/Dummytag:so^RVr^RCe 2NJUNE "sotku narussa" ;
vine+Sem/Dummytag:vi^RVn^RCe 2NJUNE "vita" ;
kojo+Sem/Dummytag:ko^RVj^RCo 2LAJO "karsta" ;
virstá+Sem/Dummytag:vi^RVrstá 2KISSA "virsta" ;
torvo+Sem/Dummytag:to^RVrvo 2KISSA "turva" ;
kulokove+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Dummytag:kulo#ko^RVv^RCe 2NJUNE "kuulokuva" ;
mááná+Sem/Dummytag:má^RVn^RCá 2CAANA "pesye" ;
kunnâjoto+Sem/Dummytag:kunnâ#jo^RVt^RCo 2LAJO "tuhkaliemi" ;
koskâmušto+Sem/Dummytag:koskâ#mu^RVšto 2KISSA "välimuisti" ;
nore+Sem/Dummytag:no^RVr^RCe 2NJUNE "kalaparvi" ;
poro+Sem/Dummytag:po^RVr^RCo 2LAJO "katkosarvi" ;
ävkkišaddo+Sem/Plant:ävkki#ša^RVddo 2KISSA "hyötykasvi" ;
imâštaho+Sem/Dummytag:imâš#ta^RVh^RCo 2TAHO "ihmeteko" ;
maaŋgâiloho+Err/Lex+Sem/Dummytag:maaŋgâi#lo^RVh^RCo 2TAHO "monikko" ;
immeelpalo+Sem/Perc-emo:immeel#pa^RVl^RCo 2LAJO "jumalanpelko" ;
pennuunjune+Sem/Dummytag:pennuu#nju^RVn^RCe 2NJUNE "koirankuono" ;
nitro+Sem/Dummytag:ni^RVtro 2KISSA "nitro" ;
mánujoto+Sem/Dummytag:mánu#jo^RVt^RCo 2LAJO "kuunkierto" ;
seksuaalucceebloho+Sem/Dummytag:seksuaal#ucceeb#lo^RVh^RCo 2TAHO "seksuaalivähemmistö" ;
kurŋoošaddo+Sem/Dummytag:kurŋoo#ša^RVddo 2KISSA "köynnös" ;
máinuskolo+Sem/Dummytag:máinus#ko^RVl^RCo 2LAJO "mainoskustannus" ;
šoddâmloho+Sem/Dummytag:šoddâm#lo^RVh^RCo 2TAHO "syntyvyys" ;
rationaalloho+Sem/Dummytag:rationaal#lo^RVh^RCo 2TAHO "rationaaliluku" ;
oktaanloho+Sem/Dummytag:oktaan#lo^RVh^RCo 2TAHO "oktaaniluku" ;
cuovkkâloho+Sem/Dummytag:cuovkkâ#lo^RVh^RCo 2TAHO "murtoluku" ;
jorgoloho+Sem/Dummytag:jorgo#lo^RVh^RCo 2TAHO "käänteisluku" ;
oornigloho+Sem/Dummytag:oornig#lo^RVh^RCo 2TAHO "järjestysluku" ;
staavvâlloho+Sem/Dummytag:staavvâl#lo^RVh^RCo 2TAHO "tavuluku" ;
šoddâmkipo+Sem/Dummytag:šoddâm#ki^RVpo 2LAJO "kasvukipu" ;
liggo+Sem/Dummytag:li^RVggo 2KISSA "räsy" ;
kipo+Sem/Dummytag:ki^RVpo 2LAJO ;
áná+Sem/Dummytag:á^RVná 2LAJO ;
lasa+Sem/Dummytag:lasa 2LAJO ;
riččá+Sem/Dummytag:ri^RVččá 2KISSA ;
ijjâsaje+Sem/Dummytag:ijjâ#sa^RVj^RCe 2NJUNE ;
sieiŋânjune+Sem/Dummytag:sieiŋâ#nju^RVn^RCe 2NJUNE ;
paastaho+Sem/Dummytag:paas#ta^RVh^RCo 2TAHO ;
pino+Sem/Dummytag:pi^RVn^RCo 2LAJO ;
ito+Sem/Dummytag:i^RVt^RCo 2LAJO ;
aalaašsino+Sem/Plant:aalaaš#si^RVn^RCo 2LAJO "tunturinata" ;
etitile+Sem/State:eti#ti^RVl^RCe 2NJUNE "hätätila" ; ! tags_via_apertium
haŋkkâčááná+Sem/Plant-fungus:haŋkkâ#čá^RVn^RCá 2CAANA "typäskääpä" ;
kolo+Sem/Money:ko^RVl^RCo 2LAJO "kulu" ;	! YAML  tags_via_apertium
kuáduičááná+Sem/Plant-fungus:kuádui#čá^RVn^RCá 2CAANA "kantokääpä" ;
listo+Sem/Txt:li^RVsto 2KISSA "lista" ;	!YAML ¢listoin, listoost, liiston, listo tags_via_apertium
littosaje+Sem/Plc:litto#sa^RVj^RCe 2NJUNE ; ! tags_via_apertium
loho+Sem/Amount:lo^RVh^RCo 2TAHO "" ; ! tags_via_apertium
njuovčâčááná+Sem/Plant-fungus:njuovčâ#čá^RVn^RCá 2CAANA "häränkielikääpä" ;
palhâšume+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Prod:palhâšu^RVm^RCe 2NJUNE "palkinto" ;	! tags_via_apertium
riššo+Sem/Buildpart:ri^RVššo 2KISSA ; ! tags_via_apertium
riššâčááná+Sem/Plant-fungus:riššâ#čá^RVn^RCá 2CAANA "rikkikääpä" ;
roto+Sem/Plc:ro^RVt^RCo 2LAJO "lehto" ;	! tags_via_apertium
ruotâsčááná+Sem/Plant-fungus:ruotâs#čá^RVn^RCá 2CAANA "juurikääpä" ;
saavzâčááná+Sem/Plant-fungus:saavzâ#čá^RVn^RCá 2CAANA "lampaankääpä" ;
tupe+Sem/Build:tu^RVp^RCe 2NJUNE "tupa" ;	! tags_via_apertium
ucceebloho+Sem/Group_Hum:ucceeb#lo^RVh^RCo 2TAHO "vähemmistö" ; ! tags_via_apertium
ääigikolo+Sem/Time:ääigi#ko^RVl^RCo 2LAJO "ajankulu" ; ! tags_via_apertium
äššilisto+Sem/Txt:äšši#li^RVsto 2KISSA "asialista" ; ! tags_via_apertium
čááná+Sem/Plant-fungus:čá^RVn^RCá 2CAANA ;
